Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.240

Fees.

The director shall charge and collect fees fixed by this section. All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury and shall not be refundable except as herein provided:

(1) The fee for filing an application for registration on the sale of franchise under RCW 19.100.040 is six hundred dollars;

(2) The fee for filing an application for renewal of a registration under RCW 19.100.070 is one hundred dollars;

(3) The fee for filing an amendment to the application filed under RCW 19.100.040 is one hundred dollars;

(4) The fee for registration of a franchise broker shall be fifty dollars for original registration and twenty-five dollars for each annual renewal;

(5) The fee for filing a notice of claim of exemption is one hundred dollars for the original filing and one hundred dollars for each annual renewal.

[ 1991 c 226 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 24.]